Florida, session 2026, SB448.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsections (15) and (16) are added to section 22 1001.43, Florida Statutes, to read: 23 1001.43âSupplemental powers and duties of district school 24 board.âThe district school board may exercise the following 25 supplemental powers and duties as authorized by this code or 26 State Board of Education rule. 27 (15)âPARENTAL NOTIFICATION OF STUDENT CAREER AND TECHNICAL 28 EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS.âBefore the end of grade 5 and each school 29 year thereafter, each student and his or her parent must be 30 provided a list of schools within the school district which 31 offer career and technical education programs and a description 32 of each program. 33 (16)âCAREER AND ACADEMIC PLANNING MEETING.âBefore course 34 registration for students entering grade 9, each district school 35 board shall require each middle school to hold a career and 36 academic planning meeting for grade 8 students and their 37 parents. The meeting must include the following information: 38 (a)âA list of schools within the school district which 39 offer career and technical education programs and a description 40 of each program. 41 (b)âInformation relating to career and postsecondary 42 planning. 43 (c)âThe eligibility requirements for federal and state 44 grants and scholarships, including the requirements for each 45 Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program award. 46 (d)âInformation obtained from the Department of Commerce, 47 local workforce boards, and CareerSource Florida, Inc., about 48 career and academic jobs available in the region of the school 49 district, including starting salaries. 50 (e)âInformation relating to dual enrollment opportunities 51 with public and private postsecondary educational institutions 52 in the region for high school students, including admission 53 requirements. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âregionâ 54 means the Florida College System service area in which the 55 school district is located. 56 (f)âA demonstration of Floridaâs online career planning and 57 work-based learning coordination system and how to access the 58 studentâs personalized academic and career plan. 59 Section 2.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 60 1003.4156, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 61 1003.4156âGeneral requirements for middle grades promotion; 62 student personalized academic and career plan requirements.â 63 (1)âIn order for a student to be promoted to high school 64 from a school that includes middle grades 6, 7, and 8, the 65 student must successfully complete the following courses: 66 (e)1.âOne course in career and education planning to be 67 completed in grades 6, 7, or 8, which may be taught by any 68 member of the instructional staff. The course must be Internet 69 based, customizable to each student, and include research-based 70 assessments to assist students in determining educational and 71 career options and goals. In addition, the course must result in 72 a completed personalized academic and career plan for the 73 student, which must use, when available, Floridaâs online career 74 planning and work-based learning coordination system. The course 75 must teach each student how to access and update the plan and 76 encourage the student to access and update the plan at least 77 annually as the student progresses through middle school and 78 high school. The personalized academic and career plan must 79 emphasize the importance of entrepreneurship and employability 80 skills and must include information from the Department of 81 Commerceâs economic security report under s. 445.07 and other 82 state career planning resources. The required personalized 83 academic and career plan must inform students of high school 84 graduation requirements, including a detailed explanation of the 85 requirements for earning a high school diploma designation under 86 s. 1003.4285 and the career and technical education pathway to 87 earn a standard high school diploma under s. 1003.4282(10); the 88 requirements for each scholarship in the Florida Bright Futures 89 Scholarship Program; state university and Florida College System 90 institution admission requirements; available opportunities to 91 earn college credit in high school, including Advanced Placement 92 courses; the International Baccalaureate Program; the Advanced 93 International Certificate of Education Program; dual enrollment, 94 including career dual enrollment; career and technical education 95 programs available within the school district; work-based 96 learning opportunities, including internships and 97 preapprenticeship and apprenticeship programs; and career 98 education courses, including career-themed courses and course 99 sequences that lead to industry certification pursuant to s. 100 1003.492 or s. 1008.44. The course may be implemented as a 101 stand-alone course or integrated into another course or courses. 102 2.âBeginning when a student enters grade 9, the studentâs 103 personalized academic and career plan must be reviewed annually 104 and include a demonstration of the stateâs online career 105 planning and work-based learning coordination system. 106 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.